Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-135
Examinations; time and place.

Examinations for credentialing shall be held on such dates and at such times and places as set by the department or the organization approved by the appropriate board or the department. Special examinations may be given at the expense of the applicant and administered by the department or the organization specified by the department.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 29, p. 461;

C.S.1929, § 71-405;

R.S.1943, § 71-129;

Laws 1984, LB 470, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 14;

Laws 1990, LB 1064, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1108, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 32;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-129;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 35.